Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201885-122
University funds; designation; investment; disbursements; travel expenses.

The several funds for the support of the university shall be constituted and designated as follows: (1) The Permanent Endowment Fund; (2) the Temporary University Fund; (3) the University Cash Fund; (4) the United States Morrill Fund; (5) the United States Experiment Station Fund; (6) the University Trust Fund; (7) the United States Agricultural Extension Fund; (8) the Veterinary School Fund; (9) the University of Nebraska at Omaha Cash Fund; (10) the University of Nebraska at Omaha Trust Fund; (11) the University of Nebraska at Kearney Cash Fund; (12) the University of Nebraska at Kearney Trust Fund; (13) the Agricultural Field Laboratory Fund; (14) the Animal Research and Diagnosis Revolving Fund; (15) the University Facility Improvement Fund; (16) the University of Nebraska Eppley Science Hall Construction Fund; and (17) the University Facilities Fund. No portion of the funds designated above derived from taxation shall be disbursed for mileage or other traveling expenses except as authorized by sections 81-1174 to 81-1177. No expenditures shall be made for or on behalf of the School of Veterinary Medicine and Surgery except from money appropriated to the Veterinary School Fund. Any money in the funds designated in this section available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act except as provided in sections 85-123.01, 85-125, 85-192, and 85-1,123.

Laws 1869, § 21, p. 177;

Laws 1877, § 1, p. 57;

Laws 1899, c. 76, § 1, p. 325;

R.S.1913, § 7100;

C.S.1922, § 6732;

C.S.1929, § 85-118;

Laws 1933, c. 96, § 23, p. 400;

Laws 1941, c. 180, § 11, p. 707;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 85-118;

R.S.1943, § 85-122;

Laws 1945, c. 257, § 1, p. 797;

Laws 1949, c. 312, § 1, p. 1030;

Laws 1951, c. 344, § 1, p. 1131;

Laws 1955, c. 350, § 5, p. 1072;

Laws 1969, c. 584, § 122, p. 2425;

Laws 1983, LB 410, § 2;

Laws 1986, LB 842, § 2;

Laws 1987, LB 218, § 2;

Laws 1988, LB 864, § 67;

Laws 1989, LB 247, § 20;

Laws 1990, LB 1220, § 2;

Laws 1992, Third Spec. Sess., LB 9, § 2;

Laws 1994, LB 1066, § 135;

Laws 2011, LB378, § 31;

Laws 2012, LB710, § 1;

Laws 2018, LB1005, § 50.
July 19, 2018
Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.

Income from government grants may be disbursed by Board of Regents without specific biennial appropriations. State ex rel. Ledwith v. Brian, 84 Neb. 30, 120 N.W. 916 (1909).

After custody of funds was given to State Treasurer, specific appropriation of funds became necessary to authorize disbursement by Board of Regents. State ex rel. Bessey v. Babcock, 17 Neb. 610, 24 N.W. 202 (1885).